Utah statutes.
32A-1-304 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Acceptance of identification -- Evidence.

(1)  A person authorized by law to sell or otherwise handle an alcoholic beverage or alcoholic product may accept as evidence of the legal age of the person presenting the following:

(a)  proof of age; or

(b)  if a statement of age is required under Subsection 32A-1-303(1):

(i)  proof of age; and

(ii)  a statement of age obtained under Section 32A-1-303.

(2)  A statement of age described in Section 32A-1-303, if properly completed, signed, and filed in accordance with Section 32A-1-303, may be offered as a defense in a case where there is at issue the legality of:

(a)  selling or otherwise furnishing an alcoholic beverage or product to the person who signed the statement of age;

(b)  admitting a minor to a premises where an alcoholic beverage or alcoholic product is sold or consumed; or

(c)  allowing the person who signed the statement of age to be employed in any employment that under this title may not be obtained by a minor.

(3)  A person authorized by law to sell or otherwise handle alcoholic beverages or products may not accept a driving privilege card issued in accordance with Section 53-3-207 as evidence of the legal age of the person.

(4)  A person may not be subject to a penalty for a violation of this part if it is proved to the commission or the court hearing the matter that the person charged with the violation acted in good faith.

